District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5608.02

District of Columbia Securities Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 802, 47 DCR 7837
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 261, 62 DCR 1884

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 261 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 261 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).